Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 7. Newborn Screening.

§ 32.1-65.
Certain newborn screening required.

In order to prevent intellectual disability and permanent disability or death, every infant who is born in the Commonwealth shall be subjected to screening tests for various disorders consistent with, but not necessarily identical to, the uniform condition panel recommended by the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Secretary’s Advisory Committee on Heritable Disorders in Newborns and Children.

Any infant whose parent or guardian objects thereto on the grounds that such tests conflict with his religious practices or tenets shall not be required to receive such screening tests.

The physician or certified nurse midwife in charge of the infant’s care after delivery shall cause such tests to be performed. The screening tests shall be performed by the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services or any other laboratory the Department of Health has contracted with to provide such service. Screening tests for time-critical disorders identified by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and the Secretary’s Advisory Committee on Heritable Disorders in Newborns and Children shall be performed seven days a week.

The program for screening infants for sickle cell diseases shall be conducted in addition to the programs provided for in Article 8 (§

32.1-68

et seq.).

History.

Code 1950, §§ 32-112.1, 32-112.9; 1966, c. 179; 1979, c. 711; 1983, c. 582; 1986, c. 172; 1988, c. 97; 1992, cc. 747, 873; 2001, c. 255; 2002, c. 440; 2004, c. 760; 2005, cc. 717, 721; 2012, cc. 147, 476, 507; 2018, c. 531.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendment of this section by Acts 1992, c. 873 has been given effect.

Acts 2005, cc. 717 and 721, cl. 2, effective March 1, 2006, repeals Acts 2002, c. 440, cl. 2, which made 2002 amendments to this section contingent on funding to 1) support Virginia Department of Health’s costs for start-up professional and family education and 2) purchase the necessary equipment for implementation of the testing program.

Acts 2018, c. 531, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2018, cc. 562 and 563, cl. 1 provides: “That the Board of Health shall amend regulations governing newborn screening to include screening for Pompe disease and mucopolysaccharidosis type 1 (MPS-1).”

Acts 2019, c. 423, cl. 1 provides: “That the Board of Health shall amend regulations governing newborn screening to include screening for congenital cytomegalovirus in newborns who fail the newborn hearing screen.”

Acts 2020, c. 416, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Health shall review Krabbe disease and provide recommendations to the Board of Health regarding whether Krabbe disease should be included in the core panel of heritable disorders and genetic diseases for which newborn screening is conducted.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 255, effective January 1, 2002, in the first paragraph, inserted “congenital adrenal hyperplasia, ” and deleted “effective July 1, 1989 ” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 440 inserted “medium-chain acyl-CoA dehydrogenase (MCAD or MCADH) deficiency” in the first sentence in the first paragraph. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c 760 substituted “physician or certified nurse midwife in charge of the infant’s care after delivery shall” for “physician, nurse or midwife in charge of the delivery of a baby or, if none, the first attending physician shall” in the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 717 and 721, effective March 1, 2006, are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph; substituted “tests conflict” for “test conflicts” in the second paragraph; and substituted “tests” for “test” in the second and third paragraphs.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 147 substituted “U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services and the Secretary’s Advisory Committee on Heritable Disorders in Newborns and Children” for “American College of Medical Genetics in its report, Newborn Screening: Toward a Uniform Screening Panel and System, that was produced for the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Further, upon the issuance of guidance for states’ newborn screening programs by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, every infant who is born in the Commonwealth shall be screened for a panel of disorders consistent with, but not necessarily identical to, the federal guidance document” in the first paragraph; and deleted “of this chapter” from the end of the final paragraph.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation” and “U.S.” for “federal” in the first paragraph, and deleted “of this chapter” at the end of the fourth paragraph.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 531, effective January 1, 2019, in the third paragraph, substituted “such service” for “this service” in the second sentence and added the third sentence.

§ 32.1-65.1.
Critical congenital heart defect screening test required.

In order to prevent disability or death, the Board shall require every hospital in the Commonwealth having a newborn nursery to perform a critical congenital heart defect screening test using pulse oximetry or other Board-approved screening test that is based on standards set forth by the American Academy of Pediatrics on every newborn in its care when such infant is at least 24 hours old but no more than 48 hours old or, in cases in which the infant is discharged from the hospital prior to reaching 24 hours of age, prior to discharging the infant.

Any infant whose parent or guardian objects thereto on the grounds that such tests conflict with his religious practices or tenets shall not be required to receive such screening tests.

The physician or health care provider in charge of the infant’s care after delivery shall cause such tests to be performed.

History.

2014, cc. 4, 175.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, cc. 4 and 175, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2014, cc. 4 and 175, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Health shall convene a work group of health care providers and other stakeholders, which shall include representatives of the Department of Health, Department of Health Professions, Virginia Commonwealth University Health System, University of Virginia Health System, Eastern Virginia Medical School, American Heart Association, Children’s National Medical Center, March of Dimes Virginia Chapter, Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, Virginia Hospital and Health Care Association, Medical Society of Virginia, Inova Fairfax Hospital, Carilion Clinic, and Virginia Chapter of the American College of Cardiology, to provide information and recommendations for the development of regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

§ 32.1-66.
Commissioner to notify physicians; reports to Commissioner.

Whenever a newborn screening test result indicates suspicion of any condition pursuant to §

32.1-65

, the Commissioner shall notify forthwith the attending physician and shall perform or provide for additional testing required to confirm or disprove the diagnosis. All physicians, certified nurse midwives, public health nurses, or any nurse receiving such test result, and administrators of hospitals in the Commonwealth, shall report the discovery of all cases of any condition for which newborn screening is conducted pursuant to §

32.1-65

to the Commissioner for infants and children up to two years of age.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-112.5; 1966, c. 179; 1979, c. 711; 1986, c. 172; 1988, c. 97; 2005, cc. 717, 721.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 717 and 721, effective March 1, 2006, are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 32.1-67.
Duty of Board for follow-up and referral protocols; regulations.

Infants identified with any condition for which newborn screening is conducted pursuant to §

32.1-65

or

32.1-65.1

shall be eligible for the services of the Children with Special Health Care Needs Program administered by the Department of Health. The Board of Health shall promulgate such regulations as may be necessary to implement Newborn Screening Services and the Children with Special Health Care Needs Program. The Board’s regulations shall include, but not be limited to, a list of newborn screening tests conducted pursuant to §§

32.1-65

and

32.1-65.1

, notification processes conducted pursuant to §

32.1-66

, follow-up procedures, appropriate referral processes, and services available for infants and children who have a heritable disorder or genetic disease identified through Newborn Screening Services.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-112.6; 1966, c. 179; 1979, c. 711; 1980, c. 470; 1981, c. 164; 1986, c. 172; 1988, c. 97; 2000, c. 916; 2005, cc. 717, 721; 2012, c. 147; 2014, cc. 4, 175.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 916, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the 2000 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2000 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.” The appropriation was made in item 307 of the Budget Bill, which increased the State Health Services appropriation.

Acts 2014, cc. 4 and 175, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2014, cc. 4 and 175, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Health shall convene a work group of health care providers and other stakeholders, which shall include representatives of the Department of Health, Department of Health Professions, Virginia Commonwealth University Health System, University of Virginia Health System, Eastern Virginia Medical School, American Heart Association, Children’s National Medical Center, March of Dimes Virginia Chapter, Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, Virginia Hospital and Health Care Association, Medical Society of Virginia, Inova Fairfax Hospital, Carilion Clinic, and Virginia Chapter of the American College of Cardiology, to provide information and recommendations for the development of regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 916 rewrote this section, which formerly read: “The Board shall recommend procedures for the treatment of biotinidase deficiency, phenylketonuria, hypothyroidism, homocystinuria, galactosemia, Maple Syrup Urine Disease and sickle cell diseases, and shall provide such treatment for infants in medically indigent families. The Board shall provide the parents or guardian of any child, who is a legal resident of the Commonwealth and who is diagnosed as requiring treatment for phenylketonuria, the special food products required in the management of phenylketonuria. The parents or guardian of any such child shall, in the discretion of the Department, reimburse to the local health department the cost of such special food products in an amount not to exceed two percent of their gross income. The reimbursement required by this section shall be payable quarterly by the first day of January, April, July, and October.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 717 and 721, effective March 1, 2006, are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 147 inserted “notification processes conducted pursuant to §

32.1-66

” in the last sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 4 and 175 are identical, and added “or

32.1-65.1

” in the first sentence and substituted “§§

32.1-65

and

32.1-65.1

” for “§

32.1-65

” in the last sentence.

§ 32.1-67.1.
Confidentiality of records; prohibition of discrimination.

The results of the newborn screening services conducted pursuant to this article may be used for research and collective statistical purposes. No publication of research or statistical data shall be made that identifies any infant having a heritable or genetic disorder.

The Commissioner may authorize linkages between secure electronic data systems maintained by the Department of Health containing newborn screening records and the Virginia Immunization Information System (VIIS) operated pursuant to §

32.1-46.01

. The Commissioner may authorize health care providers authorized to view VIIS to view the newborn screening records of individuals to whom the providers are providing health care services. The records may be made available until the child reaches seven years of age, after which the records shall not be made available through a linkage to VIIS. Such linkages shall be subject to all applicable state and federal privacy laws and regulations.

History.

1988, c. 97; 2005, cc. 717, 721; 2012, c. 147.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 717 and 721, effective March 1, 2006, are identical, and in the first sentence, inserted “newborn” preceding “screening” and substituted “services” for “programs”; in the second sentence, substituted “that” for “which” and “heritable or genetic disorder” for “genetic disease”; and substituted “newborn screening services” for “the screening programs” in the last sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 147, in the first paragraph, substituted “research or statistical data” for “information, biomedical research, or medical data” in the next-to-last sentence and deleted the last sentence, which read: “All medical records maintained as part of newborn screening services shall be confidential and shall be accessible only to the Board, the Commissioner, or his agents”; and added the final paragraph.